Hawaii statutes.
[§88-49.5 Certain employees subject to
federal retirement system; election.] Any provision in this chapter to the
contrary notwithstanding, any employee who was subject to the federal
retirement system and was a member of the employees' retirement system of the
State on July 25, 1971, shall be entitled to all benefits which accrued
from such membership and shall be permitted to continue membership in the
system with all the benefits thereof, including the right to acquire as
membership service credit pursuant to section 88-59, the period of service for
which the employee was denied membership in the system because of being subject
to the federal retirement system, provided that such election shall be made
before January 1, 1973. [L 1972, c 23, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next